Washington statutes.
RCW 17.04.245

Assessment—Tax roll—Collection.

Such assessments as are made under the provisions of RCW 17.04.240, by the weed district commissioners, shall be spread by the county assessor on the general tax roll in a separate item. Such assessments shall be collected and accounted for with the general taxes, with the terms and penalties thereto attached.

[ 1951 1st ex.s. c 6 s 1.]